Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2277.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-3603 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 79-3603. For the privilege of engaging in the business of selling
tangible personal property at retail in this state or rendering or furnishing
any of the services taxable under this act, there is hereby levied and there
shall be collected and paid a tax at the rate of 6.5%. On and after January
1, 2023, 17% and On and after January 1, 2025, 18% and on and after
July 1, 2025, 19.736% of the tax rate imposed pursuant to this section and
the rate provided in K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-3603d, and amendments
thereto, shall be levied for the state highway fund, the state highway fund
purposes and those purposes specified in K.S.A. 68-416, and amendments
thereto, and all revenue collected and received from such tax levy shall be
deposited in the state highway fund.
Within a redevelopment district established pursuant to K.S.A. 74-
8921, and amendments thereto, there is hereby levied and there shall be
collected and paid an additional tax at the rate of 2% until the earlier of the
date the bonds issued to finance or refinance the redevelopment project
have been paid in full or the final scheduled maturity of the first series of
bonds issued to finance any part of the project.
Such tax shall be imposed upon:
(a) The gross receipts received from the sale of tangible personal
property at retail within this state;
(b) the gross receipts from intrastate, interstate or international
telecommunications services and any ancillary services sourced to this
state in accordance with K.S.A. 79-3673, and amendments thereto, except
that telecommunications service does not include: (1) Any interstate or
international 800 or 900 service; (2) any interstate or international private
communications service as defined in K.S.A. 79-3673, and amendments
thereto; (3) any value-added nonvoice data service; (4) any

HB 2277 2
telecommunication service to a provider of telecommunication services
which will be used to render telecommunications services, including
carrier access services; or (5) any service or transaction defined in this
section among entities classified as members of an affiliated group as
provided by section 1504 of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as
in effect on January 1, 2001;
(c) the gross receipts from the sale or furnishing of gas, water,
electricity and heat, which sale is not otherwise exempt from taxation
under the provisions of this act, and whether furnished by municipally or
privately owned utilities, except that, on and after January 1, 2006, for
sales of gas, electricity and heat delivered through mains, lines or pipes to
residential premises for noncommercial use by the occupant of such
premises, and for agricultural use and also, for such use, all sales of
propane gas, the state rate shall be 0%; and for all sales of propane gas, LP
gas, coal, wood and other fuel sources for the production of heat or
lighting for noncommercial use of an occupant of residential premises, the
state rate shall be 0%, but such tax shall not be levied and collected upon
the gross receipts from: (1) The sale of a rural water district benefit unit;
(2) a water system impact fee, system enhancement fee or similar fee
collected by a water supplier as a condition for establishing service; or (3)
connection or reconnection fees collected by a water supplier;
(d) the gross receipts from the sale of meals or drinks furnished at any
private club, drinking establishment, catered event, restaurant, eating
house, dining car, hotel, drugstore or other place where meals or drinks are
regularly sold to the public;
(e) the gross receipts from the sale of admissions to any place
providing amusement, entertainment or recreation services including
admissions to state, county, district and local fairs, but such tax shall not
be levied and collected upon the gross receipts received from sales of
admissions to any cultural and historical event which occurs triennially;
(f) the gross receipts from the operation of any coin-operated device
dispensing or providing tangible personal property, amusement or other
services except laundry services, whether automatic or manually operated;
(g) the gross receipts from the service of renting of rooms by hotels,
as defined by K.S.A. 36-501, and amendments thereto, or by
accommodation brokers, as defined by K.S.A. 12-1692, and amendments
thereto, but such tax shall not be levied and collected upon the gross
receipts received from sales of such service to the federal government and
any agency, officer or employee thereof in association with the
performance of official government duties;
(h) the gross receipts from the service of renting or leasing of tangible
personal property except such tax shall not apply to the renting or leasing
of machinery, equipment or other personal property owned by a city and

HB 2277 3
purchased from the proceeds of industrial revenue bonds issued prior to
July 1, 1973, in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 12-1740 through
12-1749, and amendments thereto, and any city or lessee renting or leasing
such machinery, equipment or other personal property purchased with the
proceeds of such bonds who shall have paid a tax under the provisions of
this section upon sales made prior to July 1, 1973, shall be entitled to a
refund from the sales tax refund fund of all taxes paid thereon;
(i) the gross receipts from the rendering of dry cleaning, pressing,
dyeing and laundry services except laundry services rendered through a
coin-operated device whether automatic or manually operated;
(j) the gross receipts from the rendering of the services of washing
and washing and waxing of vehicles;
(k) the gross receipts from cable, community antennae and other
subscriber radio and television services;
(l) (1) except as otherwise provided by paragraph (2), the gross
receipts received from the sales of tangible personal property to all
contractors, subcontractors or repairmen for use by them in erecting
structures, or building on, or otherwise improving, altering, or repairing
real or personal property.
(2) Any such contractor, subcontractor or repairman who maintains
an inventory of such property both for sale at retail and for use by them for
the purposes described by paragraph (1) shall be deemed a retailer with
respect to purchases for and sales from such inventory, except that the
gross receipts received from any such sale, other than a sale at retail, shall
be equal to the total purchase price paid for such property and the tax
imposed thereon shall be paid by the deemed retailer;
(m) the gross receipts received from fees and charges by public and
private clubs, drinking establishments, organizations and businesses for
participation in sports, games and other recreational activities, but such tax
shall not be levied and collected upon the gross receipts received from: (1)
Fees and charges by any political subdivision, by any organization exempt
from property taxation pursuant to K.S.A. 79-201 Ninth, and amendments
thereto, or by any youth recreation organization exclusively providing
services to persons 18 years of age or younger which is exempt from
federal income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the federal
internal revenue code of 1986, for participation in sports, games and other
recreational activities; and (2) entry fees and charges for participation in a
special event or tournament sanctioned by a national sporting association
to which spectators are charged an admission which is taxable pursuant to
subsection (e);
(n) the gross receipts received from dues charged by public and
private clubs, drinking establishments, organizations and businesses,
payment of which entitles a member to the use of facilities for recreation

HB 2277 4
or entertainment, but such tax shall not be levied and collected upon the
gross receipts received from: (1) Dues charged by any organization exempt
from property taxation pursuant to K.S.A. 79-201 Eighth and Ninth, and
amendments thereto; and (2) sales of memberships in a nonprofit
organization which is exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to
section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, and whose
purpose is to support the operation of a nonprofit zoo;
(o) the gross receipts received from the isolated or occasional sale of
motor vehicles or trailers but not including: (1) The transfer of motor
vehicles or trailers by a person to a corporation or limited liability
company solely in exchange for stock securities or membership interest in
such corporation or limited liability company; (2) the transfer of motor
vehicles or trailers by one corporation or limited liability company to
another when all of the assets of such corporation or limited liability
company are transferred to such other corporation or limited liability
company; or (3) the sale of motor vehicles or trailers which are subject to
taxation pursuant to the provisions of K.S.A. 79-5101 et seq., and
amendments thereto, by an immediate family member to another
immediate family member. For the purposes of paragraph (3), immediate
family member means lineal ascendants or descendants, and their spouses.
Any amount of sales tax paid pursuant to the Kansas retailers sales tax act
on the isolated or occasional sale of motor vehicles or trailers on and after
July 1, 2004, which the base for computing the tax was the value pursuant
to K.S.A. 79-5105(a), (b)(1) and (b)(2), and amendments thereto, when
such amount was higher than the amount of sales tax which would have
been paid under the law as it existed on June 30, 2004, shall be refunded to
the taxpayer pursuant to the procedure prescribed by this section. Such
refund shall be in an amount equal to the difference between the amount of
sales tax paid by the taxpayer and the amount of sales tax which would
have been paid by the taxpayer under the law as it existed on June 30,
2004. Each claim for a sales tax refund shall be verified and submitted not
later than six months from the effective date of this act to the director of
taxation upon forms furnished by the director and shall be accompanied by
any additional documentation required by the director. The director shall
review each claim and shall refund that amount of tax paid as provided by
this act. All such refunds shall be paid from the sales tax refund fund, upon
warrants of the director of accounts and reports pursuant to vouchers
approved by the director of taxation or the director's designee. No refund
for an amount less than $10 shall be paid pursuant to this act. In
determining the base for computing the tax on such isolated or occasional
sale, the fair market value of any motor vehicle or trailer traded in by the
purchaser to the seller may be deducted from the selling price;
(p) the gross receipts received for the service of installing or applying

HB 2277 5
tangible personal property which when installed or applied is not being
held for sale in the regular course of business, and whether or not such
tangible personal property when installed or applied remains tangible
personal property or becomes a part of real estate, except that no tax shall
be imposed upon the service of installing or applying tangible personal
property in connection with the original construction of a building or
facility, the original construction, reconstruction, restoration, remodeling,
renovation, repair or replacement of a residence or the construction,
reconstruction, restoration, replacement or repair of a bridge or highway.
For the purposes of this subsection:
(1) "Original construction" means the first or initial construction of a
new building or facility. The term "original construction" shall include the
addition of an entire room or floor to any existing building or facility, the
completion of any unfinished portion of any existing building or facility
and the restoration, reconstruction or replacement of a building, facility or
utility structure damaged or destroyed by fire, flood, tornado, lightning,
explosion, windstorm, ice loading and attendant winds, terrorism or
earthquake, but such term, except with regard to a residence, shall not
include replacement, remodeling, restoration, renovation or reconstruction
under any other circumstances;
(2) "building" means only those enclosures within which individuals
customarily are employed, or which are customarily used to house
machinery, equipment or other property, and including the land
improvements immediately surrounding such building;
(3) "facility" means a mill, plant, refinery, oil or gas well, water well,
feedlot or any conveyance, transmission or distribution line of any
cooperative, nonprofit, membership corporation organized under or subject
to the provisions of K.S.A. 17-4601 et seq., and amendments thereto, or
municipal or quasi-municipal corporation, including the land
improvements immediately surrounding such facility;
(4) "residence" means only those enclosures within which individuals
customarily live;
(5) "utility structure" means transmission and distribution lines
owned by an independent transmission company or cooperative, the
Kansas electric transmission authority or natural gas or electric public
utility; and
(6) "windstorm" means straight line winds of at least 80 miles per
hour as determined by a recognized meteorological reporting agency or
organization;
(q) the gross receipts received for the service of repairing, servicing,
altering or maintaining tangible personal property which when such
services are rendered is not being held for sale in the regular course of
business, and whether or not any tangible personal property is transferred

HB 2277 6
in connection therewith. The tax imposed by this subsection shall be
applicable to the services of repairing, servicing, altering or maintaining an
item of tangible personal property which has been and is fastened to,
connected with or built into real property;
(r) the gross receipts from fees or charges made under service or
maintenance agreement contracts for services, charges for the providing of
which are taxable under the provisions of subsection (p) or (q);
(s) on and after January 1, 2005, the gross receipts received from the
sale of prewritten computer software and the sale of the services of
modifying, altering, updating or maintaining prewritten computer
software, whether the prewritten computer software is installed or
delivered electronically by tangible storage media physically transferred to
the purchaser or by load and leave;
(t) the gross receipts received for telephone answering services;
(u) the gross receipts received from the sale of prepaid calling service
and prepaid wireless calling service as defined in K.S.A. 79-3673, and
amendments thereto;
(v) all sales of bingo cards, bingo faces and instant bingo tickets by
licensees under K.S.A. 75-5171 et seq., and amendments thereto, shall be
exempt from taxes imposed pursuant to this section;
(w) all sales of charitable raffle tickets in accordance with K.S.A. 75-
5171 et seq., and amendments thereto, shall be exempt from taxes imposed
pursuant to this section; and
(x) commencing on January 1, 2023, and thereafter, the state rate on
the gross receipts from the sale of food and food ingredients shall be as set
forth in K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-3603d, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-3603d is hereby amended to read as
follows: 79-3603d. (a) There is hereby levied and there shall be collected
and paid a tax upon the gross receipts from the sale of food and food
ingredients. The rate of tax shall be as follows:
(1) Commencing on January 1, 2023, at the rate of 4%;
(2) commencing on January 1, 2024, at the rate of 2%; and
(3) commencing on January 1, 2025, and thereafter, at the rate of 0%.
(b) The provisions of this section shall not apply to prepared food
unless sold without eating utensils provided by the seller and described
below:
(1) Food sold by a seller whose proper primary NAICS classification
is manufacturing in sector 311, except subsector 3118 (bakeries);
(2) (A) food sold in an unheated state by weight or volume as a single
item; or
(B) only meat or seafood sold in an unheated state by weight or
volume as a single item;
(3) bakery items, including bread, rolls, buns, biscuits, bagels,

HB 2277 7
croissants, pastries, donuts, danish, cakes, tortes, pies, tarts, muffins, bars,
cookies and tortillas; or
(4) food sold that ordinarily requires additional cooking, as opposed
to just reheating, by the consumer prior to consumption.
(c) The provisions of this section shall be a part of and supplemental
to the Kansas retailers' sales tax act.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-3620 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 79-3620. (a) All revenue collected or received by the director of
taxation from the taxes imposed by this act shall be remitted to the state
treasurer in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto. Upon receipt of each such remittance, the state
treasurer shall deposit the entire amount in the state treasury, less amounts
withheld as provided in subsection (b) and amounts credited as provided in
subsections (c), (d) and (e), to the credit of the state general fund.
(b) A refund fund, designated as "sales tax refund fund" not to exceed
$100,000 shall be set apart and maintained by the director from sales tax
collections and estimated tax collections and held by the state treasurer for
prompt payment of all sales tax refunds. Such fund shall be in such
amount, within the limit set by this section, as the director shall determine
is necessary to meet current refunding requirements under this act. In the
event such fund as established by this section is, at any time, insufficient to
provide for the payment of refunds due claimants thereof, the director shall
certify the amount of additional funds required to the director of accounts
and reports who shall promptly transfer the required amount from the state
general fund to the sales tax refund fund, and notify the state treasurer,
who shall make proper entry in the records.
(c) (1) On January 1, 2023 2025, the state treasurer shall credit 17%
18% of the revenue collected and received from the tax imposed by K.S.A.
79-3603, and amendments thereto, at the rates provided in K.S.A. 79-
3603, and amendments thereto, and K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-3603d, and
amendments thereto, and deposited as provided by subsection (a),
exclusive of amounts credited pursuant to subsection (d), in the state
highway fund.
(2) On January July 1, 2025, and thereafter, the state treasurer shall
credit 18% 19.736% of the revenue collected and received from the tax
imposed by K.S.A. 79-3603, and amendments thereto, at the rates
provided in K.S.A. 79-3603, and amendments thereto, and K.S.A. 2024
Supp. 79-3603d, and amendments thereto, and deposited as provided by
subsection (a), exclusive of amounts credited pursuant to subsection (d), in
the state highway fund.
(d) The state treasurer shall credit all revenue collected or received
from the tax imposed by K.S.A. 79-3603, and amendments thereto, as
certified by the director, from taxpayers doing business within that portion

HB 2277 8
of a STAR bond project district occupied by a STAR bond project or
taxpayers doing business with such entity financed by a STAR bond
project as defined in K.S.A. 12-17,162, and amendments thereto, that was
determined by the secretary of commerce to be of statewide as well as
local importance or will create a major tourism area for the state or the
project was designated as a STAR bond project as defined in K.S.A. 12-
17,162, and amendments thereto, to the city bond finance fund, which fund
is hereby created. The provisions of this subsection shall expire when the
total of all amounts credited hereunder and under K.S.A. 79-3710(d), and
amendments thereto, is sufficient to retire the special obligation bonds
issued for the purpose of financing all or a portion of the costs of such
STAR bond project.
(e) All revenue certified by the director of taxation as having been
collected or received from the tax imposed by K.S.A. 79-3603(c), and
amendments thereto, on the sale or furnishing of gas, water, electricity and
heat for use or consumption within the intermodal facility district
described in this subsection, shall be credited by the state treasurer to the
state highway fund. Such revenue may be transferred by the secretary of
transportation to the rail service improvement fund pursuant to law. The
provisions of this subsection shall take effect upon certification by the
secretary of transportation that a notice to proceed has been received for
the construction of the improvements within the intermodal facility
district, but not later than December 31, 2010, and shall expire when the
secretary of revenue determines that the total of all amounts credited
hereunder and pursuant to K.S.A. 79-3710(e), and amendments thereto, is
equal to $53,300,000, but not later than December 31, 2045. Thereafter, all
revenues shall be collected and distributed in accordance with applicable
law. For all tax reporting periods during which the provisions of this
subsection are in effect, none of the exemptions contained in K.S.A. 79-
3601 et seq., and amendments thereto, shall apply to the sale or furnishing
of any gas, water, electricity and heat for use or consumption within the
intermodal facility district. As used in this subsection, "intermodal facility
district" shall consist of an intermodal transportation area as defined by
K.S.A. 12-1770a(oo), and amendments thereto, located in Johnson county
within the polygonal-shaped area having Waverly Road as the eastern
boundary, 191st Street as the southern boundary, Four Corners Road as the
western boundary, and Highway 56 as the northern boundary, and the
polygonal-shaped area having Poplar Road as the eastern boundary, 183rd
Street as the southern boundary, Waverly Road as the western boundary,
and the BNSF mainline track as the northern boundary, that includes
capital investment in an amount exceeding $150 million for the
construction of an intermodal facility to handle the transfer, storage and
distribution of freight through railway and trucking operations.

HB 2277 9
Sec. 4. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-3703 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 79-3703. (a) There is hereby levied and there shall be collected
from every person in this state a tax or excise for the privilege of using,
storing, or consuming within this state any article of tangible personal
property. Such tax shall be levied and collected in an amount equal to the
consideration paid by the taxpayer multiplied by the rate of 6.5%.
(b) Commencing on January 1, 2023, and thereafter, the state rate on
the amount equal to the consideration paid by the taxpayer from the sale of
food and food ingredients as provided in K.S.A. 79-3603, and amendments
thereto, shall be as set forth in K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-3603d, and
amendments thereto.
(c) On and after January 1, 2023, 17% and On and after January 1,
2025, 18% and on and after July 1, 2025, 19.736% of the tax rate
imposed pursuant to this section and the rate provided in K.S.A. 2024
Supp. 79-3603d, and amendments thereto, shall be levied for the state
highway fund, the state highway fund purposes and those purposes
specified in K.S.A. 68-416, and amendments thereto, and all revenue
collected and received from such tax levy shall be deposited in the state
highway fund.
(d) Within a redevelopment district established pursuant to K.S.A.
74-8921, and amendments thereto, there is hereby levied and there shall be
collected and paid an additional tax of 2% until the earlier of: (1) The date
the bonds issued to finance or refinance the redevelopment project
undertaken in the district have been paid in full; or (2) the final scheduled
maturity of the first series of bonds issued to finance the redevelopment
project.
(e) All property purchased or leased within or without this state and
subsequently used, stored or consumed in this state shall be subject to the
compensating tax if the same property or transaction would have been
subject to the Kansas retailers' sales tax had the transaction been wholly
within this state.
Sec. 5. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-3710 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 79-3710. (a) All revenue collected or received by the director
under the provisions of this act shall be remitted to the state treasurer in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto. Upon receipt of each such remittance, the state treasurer shall
deposit the entire amount in the state treasury, less amounts set apart as
provided in subsection (b) and amounts credited as provided in subsection
(c), (d) and (e), to the credit of the state general fund.
(b) A revolving fund, designated as "compensating tax refund fund"
not to exceed $10,000 shall be set apart and maintained by the director
from compensating tax collections and estimated tax collections and held
by the state treasurer for prompt payment of all compensating tax refunds.

HB 2277 10
Such fund shall be in such amount, within the limit set by this section, as
the director shall determine is necessary to meet current refunding
requirements under this act.
(c) (1) On January 1, 2023 2025, the state treasurer shall credit 17%
18% of the revenue collected and received from the tax imposed by K.S.A.
79-3703, and amendments thereto, at the rates provided in K.S.A. 79-
3703, and amendments thereto, and K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-3603d, and
amendments thereto, and deposited as provided by subsection (a),
exclusive of amounts credited pursuant to subsection (d), in the state
highway fund.
(2) On January July 1, 2025, and thereafter, the state treasurer shall
credit 18% 19.736% of the revenue collected and received from the tax
imposed by K.S.A. 79-3703, and amendments thereto, at the rates
provided in K.S.A. 79-3703, and amendments thereto, and K.S.A. 2024
Supp. 79-3603d, and amendments thereto, and deposited as provided by
subsection (a), exclusive of amounts credited pursuant to subsection (d), in
the state highway fund.
(d) The state treasurer shall credit all revenue collected or received
from the tax imposed by K.S.A. 79-3703, and amendments thereto, as
certified by the director, from taxpayers doing business within that portion
of a redevelopment district occupied by a redevelopment project that was
determined by the secretary of commerce to be of statewide as well as
local importance or will create a major tourism area for the state as defined
in K.S.A. 12-1770a, and amendments thereto, to the city bond finance
fund created by K.S.A. 79-3620(d), and amendments thereto. The
provisions of this subsection shall expire when the total of all amounts
credited hereunder and under K.S.A. 79-3620(d), and amendments thereto,
is sufficient to retire the special obligation bonds issued for the purpose of
financing all or a portion of the costs of such redevelopment project.
This subsection shall not apply to a project designated as a special bond
project as defined in K.S.A. 12-1770a(z), and amendments thereto.
(e) All revenue certified by the director of taxation as having been
collected or received from the tax imposed by K.S.A. 79-3603(c), and
amendments thereto, on the sale or furnishing of gas, water, electricity and
heat for use or consumption within the intermodal facility district
described in this subsection, shall be credited by the state treasurer to the
state highway fund. Such revenue may be transferred by the secretary of
transportation to the rail service improvement fund pursuant to law. The
provisions of this subsection shall take effect upon certification by the
secretary of transportation that a notice to proceed has been received for
the construction of the improvements within the intermodal facility
district, but not later than December 31, 2010, and shall expire when the
secretary of revenue determines that the total of all amounts credited

HB 2277 11
hereunder and pursuant to K.S.A. 79-3620(e), and amendments thereto, is
equal to $53,300,000, but not later than December 31, 2045. Thereafter, all
revenues shall be collected and distributed in accordance with applicable
law. For all tax reporting periods during which the provisions of this
subsection are in effect, none of the exemptions contained in K.S.A. 79-
3601 et seq., and amendments thereto, shall apply to the sale or furnishing
of any gas, water, electricity and heat for use or consumption within the
intermodal facility district. As used in this subsection, "intermodal facility
district" shall consist of an intermodal transportation area as defined by
K.S.A. 12-1770a(oo), and amendments thereto, located in Johnson county
within the polygonal-shaped area having Waverly Road as the eastern
boundary, 191st Street as the southern boundary, Four Corners Road as the
western boundary, and Highway 56 as the northern boundary, and the
polygonal-shaped area having Poplar Road as the eastern boundary, 183rd
Street as the southern boundary, Waverly Road as the western boundary,
and the BNSF mainline track as the northern boundary, that includes
capital investment in an amount exceeding $150 million for the
construction of an intermodal facility to handle the transfer, storage and
distribution of freight through railway and trucking operations.
Sec. 6. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-3603, 79-3603d, 79-3620, 79-3703 and
79-3710 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 7. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.